Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,203
Inventory form, defined.

Inventory form means an emergency and hazardous chemical inventory form required to be prepared by an owner or operator of any facility required to prepare or have available a material safety data sheet for a hazardous chemical under the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, 29 U.S.C. 651 et seq.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 13.